Utah statutes.
63C-7-211.   Annual report to governor and Legislature -- Contents -- Audit by state auditor -- Reimbursement for costs.

(1)  The Utah Communications Agency Network shall, following the close of each fiscal year, submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the governor and the Legislature.  Each report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement of the agency during the fiscal year it covers.

(2)  The state auditor shall at least once in each year audit the books and accounts of the Utah Communications Agency Network or shall contract with an independent certified public accountant for this audit.  The audit shall include a review of the procedures adopted under the requirements of Subsection 63C-7-210(2) and a determination as to whether the board has complied with the requirements of Subsection 63C-7-210(2).

(3)  The Utah Communications Agency Network shall reimburse the state auditor from available money of the Utah Communications Agency Network for the actual and necessary costs of that audit.

